Massachusetts, session 194th, H4186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, or by-law, to the contrary, the Edgartown
Affordable Housing Trust, established pursuant to G. L. c. 44, sec. 55C, may expend funds for
community housing for households earning up to 180 percent of the County of Dukes County
median household income as reported from time to time by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development, except for any Community Preservation Act funds which will
be subject to the income limits set forth in the Community Preservation Act.
of 1